apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="patrol__vblex"><e><par n="control__vblex"/></e></pardef>

<pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ep</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ep</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eps</l>       <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pt</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pt</l>        <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eping</l>     <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="deal__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="d/ig__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igs</l>       <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/aw__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aws</l>       <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awn</l>       <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awing</l>     <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>      <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ive__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iven</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spel/l__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>led</l>       <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>led</l>       <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/eat__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eat</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eat</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eats</l>      <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaten</l>     <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eating</l>    <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eling</l>     <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ight</l>      <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ight</l>      <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ights</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ighting</l>   <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ght</l>       <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ght</l>       <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ghts</l>      <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ghting</l>    <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>own</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e  r="LR">       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ids</l>       <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l>        <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idden</l>     <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idding</l>    <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="befall">          <i>befal</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blight">          <i>bl</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="creep">           <i>cre</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dig">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deal">            <i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deal with">       <i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/><p><l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="drink">           <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="draw">            <i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drive">           <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ive__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drill">           <i>dril</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dwell">           <i>dwel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eat">             <par n="/eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fight">           <i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel">            <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fly">             <i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flee">            <i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forbid">          <i>forb</i><par n="forb/id__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="foretell">        <i>foretel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="keep on">         <i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="keep">            <i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lean">            <i>lean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leap">            <i>leap</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="learn">           <i>learn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="light">           <i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mean">            <i>mean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="patrol">          <i>patrol</i><par n="patrol__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sleep">           <i>sle</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smell">           <i>smel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spell">           <i>spel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spill">           <i>spil</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sweep">           <i>swe</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swell">           <i>swel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="weep">            <i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="withdraw">        <i>withdr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
